Connecticut, session 2026, SB00447.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 12-81 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is amended by adding subdivision (85) as follows (Effective from passage
and applicable to assessment years commencing on or after October 1, 2027):
(NEW) (85) (A) Any dwelling declared to be the primary residence of
(i) the owner or owners of such dwelling, or (ii) any person or persons
for whom such dwelling is held in trust, in accordance with the
provisions of subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, to the amount of fifty
thousand dollars of the assessed value of such dwelling.
(B) Any owner or owners of a dwelling, or person or persons for
whom such dwelling is held in trust, claiming the exemption provided
in this subdivision for any assessment year shall, on or before the first
day of November in such assessment year, file with the assessor or
board of assessors in the municipality in which such dwelling is located
an application claiming such exemption. Such application shall be made
in the manner prescribed and on a form prepared for such purpose by
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, and shall include,
but not be limited to, a declaration that (i) such dwelling is the primary
residence of the applicant or applicants, (ii) the applicant or applicants
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 447
have no other primary residence, and (iii) the applicant or applicants
have not claimed the exemption provided in this subdivision for more
than one such dwelling in the same assessment year, and any
documentation the secretary deems necessary to verify such
declaration. The secretary shall make such application available to the
public on the Internet web site of the Office of Policy and Management.
Failure to file such application in the manner and form provided by the
secretary within the time limit prescribed shall constitute a waiver of the
right to such exemption for such assessment year.
(C) As used in this subdivision, "dwelling" means a single-family
dwelling, condominium, as defined in section 47-68a, or unit in a
common interest community, as defined in section 47-202.
Sec. 2. Section 12-81oo of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
is repealed. (Effective October 1, 2027)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage and 12-81(85)
applicable to assessment
years commencing on or
after October 1, 2027
Sec. 2 October 1, 2027 Repealer section
PD Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2